Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2062
Anatomic pathology service; unprofessional
conduct.

(1)
It shall be unprofessional conduct for any physician who orders but does not
supervise or perform a component of an anatomic pathology service to fail
to disclose in any bill for such service presented to a patient, entity, or
person:

(a) The name
and address of the physician or laboratory that provided the anatomic service;
and

(b) The actual amount paid or to be paid for each anatomic pathology
service provided to the patient by the physician or laboratory that performed
the service.

(2) For purposes of this section, anatomic pathology service means:

(a) Blood-banking services performed by pathologists;

(b) Cytopathology,
which means the microscopic examination of cells from the following: Fluids;
aspirates; washings; brushings; or smears, including the Pap test examination
performed by a physician or under the supervision of a physician;

(c) Hematology,
which means the microscopic evaluation of bone marrow aspirates and biopsies
performed by a physician or under the supervision of a physician and peripheral
blood smears when the attending or treating physician or technologist requests
that a blood smear be reviewed by the pathologist;

(d) Histopathology or surgical pathology,
which means the gross and microscopic examination and histologic processing
of organ tissue performed by a physician or under the supervision of a physician;
and

(e) Subcellular pathology and molecular pathology.

(3) For purposes
of this section, anatomic pathology service does not include the initial collection
or packaging of the specimen for transport.

Laws 2009, LB394, § 2.